Utah statutes.
73-3-21 (Repealed 05/11/10).   Priorities between appropriators.
Appropriators shall have priority among themselves according to the dates of
their respective appropriations, so that each appropriator shall be entitled
to receive his whole supply before any subsequent appropriator shall have any
right; provided, in times of scarcity, while priority of appropriation shall
give the better right as between those using water for the same purpose, the
use for domestic purposes, without unnecessary waste, shall have preference
over use for all other purposes, and use for agricultural purposes shall have
preference over use for any other purpose except domestic use.
